Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1301
Policy of state.

It is declared to be the policy of this state to reduce the number of fatalities and injuries caused by collisions between motor vehicles and railroad trains; to eliminate as far as possible unnecessary conflicts between railroad transportation and highway transportation; to improve the movement of both rail and highway traffic by eliminating grade crossings; and to assist in relocation of railroad facilities that bisect the central portions of municipalities, thus hampering the growth of both the municipality and the railroad services; the effect of such policies being to benefit and enhance the community as a whole. These policies shall not be implemented in any manner without just compensation to all damaged parties, including both railroads and shippers, and, where appropriate, alternate routes for affected railroads.

Laws 1971, LB 919, § 1.